zh-TW: 相容煙斗濾芯尺寸: 6 公釐; 8 公釐; 9 公釐; 無濾網; 其他
sv: Kompatibel rörfilterstorlek: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Inget filter; Övrigt
fr: Dimension de filtre de pipe compatible: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Sans filtre; Autre
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος φίλτρου σωλήνα: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Χωρίς φίλτρο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Suderinamas pypkės filtro dydis: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Be filtro; Kita
da: Kompatibel rørfilterstørrelse: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Intet filter; Andet
vi: Kích thước bộ lọc ống tương thích: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Không có bộ lọc; Khác
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на филтър за лула: 6 мм; 8 мм; 9 мм; Без филтър; Друго
nb: Kompatibel rørfilterstørrelse: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Uten filter; Annet
th: ขนาดตัวกรองท่อที่เข้ากันได้: 6 มม.; 8 มม.; 9 มม.; ไม่มีตัวกรอง; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť potrubného filtra: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Bez filtra; Iné
sl-SI: Združljiva velikost cevi za filter: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Brez filtra; Drugo
ro-RO: Dimensiune filtru conductă compatibil: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Fără filtru; Altele
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina filtra za cijevi: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Bez filtra; Ostalo
tr: Uyumlu pipo filtresi boyutu: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Filtresiz; Diğer
en: Compatible pipe filter size: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; No filter; Other
pt-PT: Tamanho de filtro de tubo compatível: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Sem filtro; Outro
ko: 호환 파이프 필터 크기: 6mm; 8mm; 9mm; 필터 없음; 기타
pt-BR: Tamanho de filtro de tubo compatível: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Sem filtro; Outro
ja: 互換性のあるパイプフィルターサイズ: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; フィルターなし; その他
nl: Compatibele pijp filtermaat: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Geen filter; Overig
pl: Kompatybilny rozmiar filtra do fajki: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Bez filtra; Inne
zh-CN: 适配烟斗滤芯尺寸: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; 无滤芯; 其他
it: Filtro per tubi compatibile: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Nessun filtro; Altro
fi: Yhteensopiva piipun suodattimen koko: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Ei suodatinta; Muu
cs: Kompatibilní velikost potrubního filtru: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Bez filtru; Jiné
es: Tamaño de filtro de tubería compatible: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Sin filtro; Otro
hu: Kompatibilis csőszűrőméret: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Szűrő nélküli; Egyéb
de: Kompatible Pfeifenfiltergröße: 6 mm; 8 mm; 9 mm; Ohne Filter; Sonstige
ru: Совместимый размер фильтра для трубки: 6 мм; 8 мм; 9 мм; Без фильтра; Другое